North Carolina statutes. Chapter 72. Inns, Hotels and Restaurants.
Article 4. Licensing and Regulation of Tourist Camps and Homes, Cabin Camps, Roadhouses and Public Dance Halls. [Repealed]

§§ 72-31 through 72-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-203, s. 38, effective August 17, 2004.

§ 72-39.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 402.

§§ 72-40 through 72-45.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-203, s. 38, effective August 17, 2004.

Cross References.

As to regulation of food and lodging facilities, see

G.S. 130A-247

et seq.